languages/apertium-nog/tests/l-stuff.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] оьз":
    оьз<prn><ref><px1sg><nom> : оьзим
    оьз<prn><ref><px3pl><nom> : оьзлери
    оьз<prn><ref><px3pl><gen> : оьзлерининъ

  "[twol] ifi":
    ал<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : алдым
    ал<v><tv><ifi><p3><pl> : алдылар
